Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.230

Point injection therapy services—Education and training.

(1) Prior to providing point injection therapy services, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner must obtain the education and training necessary to provide the service.

(2) Any acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner performing point injection therapy prior to June 9, 2016, must be able to demonstrate, upon request of the department of health, successful completion of education and training in point injection therapy.

(3) Prior to administering local anesthetics, epinephrine, or oxygen in providing point injection therapy services, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner must satisfy education and training requirements established by the department. The department must adopt rules establishing these requirements by July 1, 2022.

[ 2021 c 87 s 2; 2019 c 308 s 12; 2016 c 97 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.